Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-237.02
Preference point, defined.

Preference point means a point or points accrued by an applicant for preference in a structured random permit drawing in which the draw is structured by the number of preference points and the applicants with the most points are drawn first.

Laws 2020, LB287, § 4.